District of Columbia statutes.
50-1202

Lien to appear on certificate of title; effect of other liens.

During the time a certificate is outstanding for any motor vehicle or trailer, no lien against such motor vehicle or trailer or any equipment or accessories affixed or sold to be affixed thereto shall be valid except as between the parties and as to other persons having actual notice, unless and until entered on such certificate as hereinafter set forth; provided, that the foregoing shall not apply to a lien or liens in existence on January 1, 1940, against a motor vehicle or trailer for which a certificate is outstanding on January 1, 1941, or any equipment or accessories affixed thereto. The filing provisions of Article 9 of Subtitle I of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code do not apply to liens recorded as herein provided, and a lien has no greater validity or effect during the time a certificate is outstanding for the motor vehicle or trailer covered thereby by reason of the fact that the lien has been filed in accordance with that article. The perfection of a security interest of a motor vehicle or trailer under D.C. Official Code § 28:9-311(b) occurs upon receipt by the appropriate official in the Department of Motor Vehicles of a properly tendered application for a certificate of title on which the security interest is to be indicated.

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 736, ch. 527, § 2
Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 771, Pub. L. 88-243, § 6(b)
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 12, 60 DCR 2634
1981 Ed., § 40-1002.
1973 Ed., § 40-702.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-299 added the last sentence.